North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 2. North Carolina Fertilizer Law of 1947. [Repealed]

§§ 106-27 through 106-50.
[Repealed]

Superseded by G.S. 106-50.1 to 106-50.22.

§§ 106-50.1 through 106-50.22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 303, s. 24.

Cross References.

For present statute covering the subject matter of the repealed sections, see

G.S. 106-655

et seq.

§§ 106-50.23 through 106-50.27.

Reserved for future codification purposes.